ess.lexc
LEXICON EmotionalRoot

aghliigh         EmotionalRootPostbase; ! overwhelmed
alangghu         EmotionalRootPostbase; ! missing something; at a loss
anumi            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! favoring; concerned for
eflegh           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! uncomfortable from something on skin, i.e. wetness, stickiness, poorly fitting clothing, etc.
efqugh           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! pleased; satisfied
efsi             EmotionalRootPostbase; ! sick and tired of someone or something; rejecting; disliking
egtug            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! anxious
elpeg            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! being edgy; sensing something; being aware of something
esliga           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! awkward; out of place
igalnga          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! utilizing an unexpected opportunity or inviting situation
igamsiqa         EmotionalRootPostbase; ! thankful; grateful
igha             EmotionalRootPostbase; ! disgusted; feeling aversion
igherngu         EmotionalRootPostbase; ! uncomfortable, awkward, or embarrassed upon observing something that is too private, indecent or otherwise disquieting
iisqugh          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! intimidated; hesitant to look another in the eye; considerate of the feelings of others; self-conscious
imugh            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! on the verge of crying; tearful
iyamsiqa         EmotionalRootPostbase; ! thankful; grateful
kayngu           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! embarrassed; ashamed
kelli            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! lustful; desiring
kusge            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! squeamish; finicky
megnu            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! caring deeply; valuing; holding as important
mighu            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! unappetizing
nanggha          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! interesting; exciting
nanglleg         EmotionalRootPostbase; ! compassionate; feeling pity.
nellug           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! uncomfortable; claustrophobic; ill at ease
paqna            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! apprehensive; wary of danger; worried; concerned
peghtu           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! overwhelmed
pellagh          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! lonely; bored
pesugh           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! stuffy; suffocating
qaazugh          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! alienated; depressed; out of place or out of sorts; odd
qesug            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! happy; excited; enjoying
qiliigh          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! coveting; desiring
qugina           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! ticklish
quginag          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! terrified especially of the supernatural; spooked; scared
saghiigha        EmotionalRootPostbase; ! astonished; amazed
sikna            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! selfish; possessive; valuing; conserving; holding dear
taayug           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! hurried; pressed for time
takagh           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! inhibited; shy; respectful
tallugh          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! shy; intimidated; cowed; timid
teghig           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! having fun; enjoying oneself; game animal (sea or land, not birds)
tengghu          EmotionalRootPostbase; ! enthusiastic
ugumi            EmotionalRootPostbase; ! hateful; angry; frustrated; finding something cute
vighvi           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! annoyed at one's hyperactivity
yakugh           EmotionalRootPostbase; ! in danger; fearful of danger
yimi             EmotionalRootPostbase; ! shy; intimidated; cowering; inhibited
yumi             EmotionalRootPostbase; ! shy; intimidated; cowering; inhibited


LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbase

-@₁~fnagh:@₁~fnagh                VerbIntr2;
-~–ke/@₁~yuke:[To_Feel_R_Toward]  VerbTrns2;
-~–ketagh:~–ketagh                VerbIntr2;
-tagh:tagh                        VerbIntr2;
-@₁~fyug:@₁~fyug                  VerbIntr2;
-~–ketagh:~–ketagh                NounPostbase2;
-@₁~fnagh:@₁~fnagh                NounPostbase2;
-tagh:tagh                        NounPostbase2;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                          !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Inflection of Demonstratives               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                          !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON DemInfl 
0:0                  EncliticOrEnd;

-pi:pi               VerbIntr2;
-pi:pi               VerbTrns2;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@[Loc]-ete:@P.VALENCE.INTR@~f-wnte**  VerbMoodInfl;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                             !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Inflection of Personal Pronouns               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                             !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Demonstrative
awa                DemInfl;  inga                DemInfl;  ama                 DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
aga                DemInfl;  ika                 DemInfl;  akma                DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
paga               DemInfl;  pika                DemInfl;  pama                DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
un'ga              DemInfl;  kana                DemInfl;  sama                DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
                             kana                DemInfl;  sakma               DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
qawa               DemInfl;  kiwa                DemInfl;  qama                DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
qaga               DemInfl;                                qakma               DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
maa                DemInfl;  wha                 DemInfl;  ima                 DemInfl;  ! Adv Ptcl               |
                             uka                  DemInfl;                               ! Adv Ptcl               |
